Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.380

Running start program—School district not responsible for transportation.

Transportation to and from the institution of higher education is not the responsibility of the school district.

[ 1994 c 205 s 9; 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 409.]

NOTES:

Finding—Severability—1990 1st ex.s. c 9: See notes following RCW 28A.225.220.